District of Columbia statutes.
8-1031.12

Solid Waste Diversion Fund.

(a)

There is established as a special fund the Solid Waste Diversion Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Department of Public Works in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

(b)

Revenue from the following sources shall be deposited in the Fund:

(1)

The surcharge established under § 8-1031.11(a)(2);

(2)

Any money in the District Recycle Program Fund as of February 26, 2015; and

(3)

Other funds designated by the Mayor.

(c)

Money in the Fund shall be used to offset the cost of developing new and additional methods of solid waste diversion in the District.

(d)

The money deposited into the Fund, and interest earned, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time.

History

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 112, 61 DCR 9971